Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.183.020

Principles.

The principles of an effective language access program for culturally responsive, systemic family engagement are as follows:

(1) Accessibility and equity. Schools provide access to all; two-way communication is a priority and is woven into the design of all programs and services;

(2) Accountability and transparency. The language access program and decision-making processes at all levels are: Open, accessible, and useable to families; proactive, not reactive; continuously improved based on ongoing feedback from families and staff; and regulated by a clear and just complaint process;

(3) Responsive culture. Schools are safe, compassionate places where each family's opinions are heard, needs are met, and contributions are valued. School staff are humble and empathetic towards families; and

(4) Focus on relationships. Schools seek to relate to families on an individual level, building trust through respectful relationships that recognize the unique strengths that each family and student possesses.

[ 2022 c 107 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2022 c 107: See note following RCW 28A.183.010.